District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.02

Processing of sexual assault forensic examination kits and specimens.

(a)

Within 7 days after a sexual assault victim makes a report to the MPD, the MPD shall retrieve the kits and specimens and deliver:

(1)

The sexual assault forensic examination kit to the DFDFS; and

(2)

The biological specimens for toxicology testing to the OCME.

(b)

The DFS shall process all sexual assault forensic examination kits within 90 days from the date of receipt.

(c)

The OCME shall process all biological specimens within 90 days from the date of receipt.

History

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 202, 61 DCR 5913